Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-405
Defense.

It shall be a complete defense in any action brought under the Minor Alcoholic Liquor Liability Act that the intoxication did not contribute to the negligent conduct.

Laws 2007, LB573, § 5.